Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.250

Initiatives and referenda to the people—Certificates of sufficiency.

If a referendum or initiative petition for submission of a measure to the people is found sufficient, the secretary of state shall at the time and in the manner that he or she certifies to the county auditors of the various counties the names of candidates for state and district officers certify to each county auditor the serial numbers and ballot titles of the several initiative and referendum measures to be voted upon at the next ensuing general election or special election ordered by the legislature.

[ 2023 c 109 s 5; 2013 c 11 s 75; 2008 c 1 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 960, approved November 6, 2007); 2003 c 111 s 1825; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.230. Prior: 1913 c 138 s 19; RRS s 5415. Formerly RCW 29.79.230.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 109: See note following RCW 29A.32.070.

Findings—Intent—Construction—Severability—Subheadings and part headings not law—Short title—Effective date—2008 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 960): See notes following RCW 43.135.031.